lt-LT: Priežiūros rinkinio formatas: Dėžutė; Reikmenų krepšys; Kita
fi: Siistimissarjaformaatti: Laatikko; Merimiessäkki; Muu
hr-HR: Oblik kompleta za njegu: Kutija; Torba za opremu; Ostalo
pl: Format zestawu do pielęgnacji: Pudło; Torba na akcesoria; Inne
bg-BG: Размер на комплект за подстригване: Кутия; Комплект чанта; Други
ko: 그루밍 키트 형식: 상자; 키트 가방; 기타
de: Format des Pflegesets: Kasten; Kit-Tasche; Sonstiges
th: รูปแบบของชุดกรูมมิ่ง: กล่อง; กระเป๋าชุดเครื่องมือ; อื่นๆ
ru: Формат набора для ухода: Коробка; Сумка для принадлежностей; Другое
ro-RO: Format trusă de îngrijire: Cutie; Geantă pentru echipament; Altele
ja: 身だしなみキットの大きさ: ボックス; キットバッグ; その他
en: Grooming kit format: Box; Kit bag; Other
pt-PT: Formato do kit de higiene: Caixa; Saco de kit; Outro
sl-SI: Format kompleta za nego: Pravokotna; Torba za opremo; Drugo
sv: Format på rakningssats: Låda; Kitväska; Övrigt
el: Μορφή κιτ περιποίησης: Κουτί; Τσάντα κιτ; Άλλο
hu: Ápolókészlet jellege: Doboz; Felszereléstartó zsák; Egyéb
tr: Bakım seti formatı: Kutu; Kit çantası; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ holiacej súpravy: Škatuľa; Taška na súpravu; Iné
zh-CN: 梳理套装形态: 箱; 工具包; 其他
vi: Dạng bộ dụng cụ chải chuốt: Hộp; Túi đồ; Khác
zh-TW: 美容套件格式: 盒; 工具包; 其他
nl: Grootte verzorgingsset: Box; Kittas; Andere
nb: Format på pleiesett: Eske; Settbag; Annet
it: Formato del kit per la cura del bambino: Scatola; Borsa per kit; Altro
es: Formato del kit de aseo: Caja; Bolsa de kit; Otros
cs: Forma sady pro péči: Krabice; Taška na soupravu; Jiné
pt-BR: Formato do kit de higiene: Caixa; Saco de kit; Outro
da: Groomingsætformat: Boks; Sættaske; Andet
fr: Format kit de toilettage: Boîte; Trousse; Autre